Utah statutes.
63C-13-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Authority" means the Prison Relocation and Development Authority, created in Section 63C-13-103.

(2)  "Prison relocation project" means a project or potential project to relocate the state prison to another suitable location in the state in order to allow private development of the land on which the state prison is presently located, subject to applicable local land use and other ordinances.



Enacted by Chapter 408, 2011 General Session

